North Dakota statutes. TITLE 44 Offices and Officers
CHAPTER 44-04 Duties, Records, and Meetings
44-04-18.4.
Confidentiality of trade secret, proprietary, commercial, financial, and research information. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Trade secret, proprietary, commercial, and financial information is confidential if it is of a privileged nature and it has not been previously publicly disclosed.

Under this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commercial information” means information pertaining to buying or selling of goods and services that has not been previously publicly disclosed and that if the information were to be disclosed would impair the public entity’s future ability to obtain necessary information or would cause substantial competitive injury to the person from which the information was obtained.

“Financial information” means information pertaining to monetary resources of a person that has not been previously publicly disclosed and that if the information were to be disclosed would impair the public entity’s future ability to obtain necessary information or would cause substantial competitive injury to the person from which the information was obtained.

“Proprietary information” includes:

Information shared between a sponsor of research or a potential sponsor of research and a public entity conducting or negotiating an agreement for the research.

Information received from a private business that has entered or is negotiating an agreement with a public entity to conduct research or manufacture or create a product for potential commercialization.

A discovery or innovation generated by the research information, technical information, financial information, or marketing information acquired under activities described under paragraph 1 or 2.

A document specifically and directly related to the licensing or commercialization resulting from activities described under paragraph 1, 2, or 6.

Technical, financial, or marketing records that are received by a public entity, which are owned or controlled by the submitting person, are intended to be and are treated by the submitting person as private, and the disclosure of which would cause harm to the submitting person’s business.

A discovery or innovation produced by the public entity that an employee or the entity intends to commercialize.

A computer software program and components of a computer software program that are subject to a copyright or a patent and any formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or process supplied to a public entity that is the subject of efforts by the supplying person to maintain its secrecy and that may derive independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other persons that might obtain economic value from its disclosure or use.

A discovery or innovation that is subject to a patent or a copyright, and any formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, combination of devices, method, technique, technical know-how or process that is for use, or is used, in the operation of a business and is supplied to or prepared by a public entity that is the subject of efforts by the supplying or preparing person to maintain its secrecy and provides the preparing person an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over those who do not know or use it or that may derive independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, a person that might obtain economic value from its disclosure or use.

“Trade secret” means information, including a formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, technical know-how, or process, that:

Derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other persons that can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use; and

Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain the secrecy of the information.

This section does not limit or otherwise affect a record pertaining to any rule of the state department of health or department of environmental quality or to any record pertaining to the application for a permit or license necessary to do business or to expand business operations within this state, except as otherwise provided by law.

This section does not limit the release or use of records obtained in an investigation by the attorney general or other law enforcement official.

Unless made confidential under subsection 1, the following economic development records and information are exempt:

Records and information pertaining to a prospective location of a business or industry, including the identity, nature, and location of the business or industry, when no previous public disclosure has been made by the business or industry of the interest or intent of the business or industry to locate in, relocate within, expand within this state, or partner with a public entity to conduct research or to license a discovery or innovation. This exemption does not include records pertaining to the application for permits or licenses necessary to do business or to expand business operations within this state, except as otherwise provided by law.

Trade secrets and proprietary, commercial, or financial information received from a person that is interested in applying for or receiving financing, technical assistance, or other forms of business assistance.

Unless made confidential under subsection 1 or made exempt under subsection 5:

Bids received by a public entity in response to an invitation for bids by the public entity are exempt until all of the bids have been received and opened by the public entity.

Proposals received by a public entity in response to a request for proposals are exempt records until a notice of intent to award is issued.

Records included with any bid or proposal naming and generally describing the entity submitting the proposal are open.

Unless made confidential under subsection 1, records received or distributed by the state department of emergency services under chapter 37-17.1 and the state local intelligence center from the federal government and any public or private agency or entity for emergency or disaster prevention, protection, mitigation, response, and recovery, or for cyber or physical threat are exempt. Records in the possession or under the control of a public entity which relate to cybersecurity information or critical infrastructure, the disclosure of which may expose or create vulnerability of critical infrastructure systems; or the safeguarding of telecommunications, electric, water, sanitary sewage, storm water drainage, energy, fuel supply, hazardous liquid, natural gas, coal, or other critical infrastructure system, are exempt.

Upon receipt of a request for records under this subsection which originated in a federal agency or entity and are in the possession of the state department of emergency services, state local intelligence center, or other public entity, the requester must be referred to the federal agency or entity from which the records originated to submit an application under the applicable federal laws or rules.

For purposes of this section, “cybersecurity” means processes or capabilities that protect and defend systems, communications, and information from exploitation and unauthorized use or modification.

For purposes of this section, “critical infrastructure” has the same meaning as in subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 44-04-24.

Unless made confidential under subsection 1, university research records are exempt. “University research records” means data and records, other than a financial or administrative record, produced or collected by or for faculty or staff of an institution under the control of the state board of higher education in the conduct of or as a result of study or research on an educational, commercial, scientific, artistic, technical, or scholarly issue, regardless of whether the study or research was sponsored by the institution alone, or in conjunction with a governmental or private entity, provided the information has not been publicly released, published, or patented.

Personally identifiable study information is confidential. “Personally identifiable study information” means information about an individual participating in a human research study or project at an institution under the control of the state board of higher education which requires prospective institutional review board review or a determination of exemption, if the information can be used to distinguish or trace the individual’s identity, or is linked or linkable to the individual. Examples of personally identifiable study information include name, maiden name, mother’s maiden name, alias, personal identification number, social security number, passport number, driver’s license number, taxpayer identification number, financial account or credit card number, address, electronic mail address, photographic images, fingerprints, handwriting, and other biometric data. Information about participants in human subjects research which does not constitute personally identifiable study information but is part of a human subjects research study or project at an institution under the control of the state board of higher education requiring prospective institutional review board review or a determination of exemption is a university research record under subsection 8.

Subsections 8 and 9 do not apply to a student record or other information disclosed by an institution under the control of the state board of higher education to the statewide longitudinal data system.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 1; 1993, ch. 441, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 155, § 3; 1997, ch. 381, § 8; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 6; 2007, ch. 385, § 1; 2013, ch. 338, § 1; 2017, ch. 309, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 312, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 239, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 312, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 199, § 54, effective April 29, 2019; 2019, ch. 370, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under
S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

This section is set out above to reflect that the contingency of the section has been met.

Section 44-04-18.4 was amended 4 times by the Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 312, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2295; Section 1 of Chapter 309, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1108; Section 54 of Chapter 199, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2327; and Section 2 of Chapter 239, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1090.

44-04-18.4.
Confidentiality of trade secret, proprietary, commercial, financial, and research information. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Trade secret, proprietary, commercial, and financial information is confidential if it is of a privileged nature and it has not been previously publicly disclosed.

Under this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commercial information” means information pertaining to buying or selling of goods and services that has not been previously publicly disclosed and that if the information were to be disclosed would impair the public entity’s future ability to obtain necessary information or would cause substantial competitive injury to the person from which the information was obtained.

“Financial information” means information pertaining to monetary resources of a person that has not been previously publicly disclosed and that if the information were to be disclosed would impair the public entity’s future ability to obtain necessary information or would cause substantial competitive injury to the person from which the information was obtained.

“Proprietary information” includes:

Information shared between a sponsor of research or a potential sponsor of research and a public entity conducting or negotiating an agreement for the research.

Information received from a private business that has entered or is negotiating an agreement with a public entity to conduct research or manufacture or create a product for potential commercialization.

A discovery or innovation generated by the research information, technical information, financial information, or marketing information acquired under activities described under paragraph 1 or 2.

A document specifically and directly related to the licensing or commercialization resulting from activities described under paragraph 1, 2, or 6.

Technical, financial, or marketing records that are received by a public entity, which are owned or controlled by the submitting person, are intended to be and are treated by the submitting person as private, and the disclosure of which would cause harm to the submitting person’s business.

A discovery or innovation produced by the public entity that an employee or the entity intends to commercialize.

A computer software program and components of a computer software program that are subject to a copyright or a patent and any formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or process supplied to a public entity that is the subject of efforts by the supplying person to maintain its secrecy and that may derive independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other persons that might obtain economic value from its disclosure or use.

A discovery or innovation that is subject to a patent or a copyright, and any formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, combination of devices, method, technique, technical know-how or process that is for use, or is used, in the operation of a business and is supplied to or prepared by a public entity that is the subject of efforts by the supplying or preparing person to maintain its secrecy and provides the preparing person an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over those who do not know or use it or that may derive independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, a person that might obtain economic value from its disclosure or use.

“Trade secret” means information, including a formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, technical know-how, or process, that:

Derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other persons that can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use; and

Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain the secrecy of the information.

This section does not limit or otherwise affect a record pertaining to any rule of the department of health and human services or department of environmental quality or to any record pertaining to the application for a permit or license necessary to do business or to expand business operations within this state, except as otherwise provided by law.

This section does not limit the release or use of records obtained in an investigation by the attorney general or other law enforcement official.

Unless made confidential under subsection 1, the following economic development records and information are exempt:

Records and information pertaining to a prospective location of a business or industry, including the identity, nature, and location of the business or industry, when no previous public disclosure has been made by the business or industry of the interest or intent of the business or industry to locate in, relocate within, expand within this state, or partner with a public entity to conduct research or to license a discovery or innovation. This exemption does not include records pertaining to the application for permits or licenses necessary to do business or to expand business operations within this state, except as otherwise provided by law.

Trade secrets and proprietary, commercial, or financial information received from a person that is interested in applying for or receiving financing, technical assistance, or other forms of business assistance.

Unless made confidential under subsection 1 or made exempt under subsection 5:

Bids received by a public entity in response to an invitation for bids by the public entity are exempt until all of the bids have been received and opened by the public entity.

Proposals received by a public entity in response to a request for proposals are exempt records until a notice of intent to award is issued.

Records included with any bid or proposal naming and generally describing the entity submitting the proposal are open.

Unless made confidential under subsection 1, records received or distributed by the state department of emergency services under chapter 37-17.1 and the state local intelligence center from the federal government and any public or private agency or entity for emergency or disaster prevention, protection, mitigation, response, and recovery, or for cyber or physical threat are exempt. Records in the possession or under the control of a public entity which relate to cybersecurity information or critical infrastructure, the disclosure of which may expose or create vulnerability of critical infrastructure systems; or the safeguarding of telecommunications, electric, water, sanitary sewage, storm water drainage, energy, fuel supply, hazardous liquid, natural gas, coal, or other critical infrastructure system, are exempt.

Upon receipt of a request for records under this subsection which originated in a federal agency or entity and are in the possession of the state department of emergency services, state local intelligence center, or other public entity, the requester must be referred to the federal agency or entity from which the records originated to submit an application under the applicable federal laws or rules.

For purposes of this section, “cybersecurity” means processes or capabilities that protect and defend systems, communications, and information from exploitation and unauthorized use or modification.

For purposes of this section, “critical infrastructure” has the same meaning as in subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 44-04-24.

Unless made confidential under subsection 1, university research records are exempt. “University research records” means data and records, other than a financial or administrative record, produced or collected by or for faculty or staff of an institution under the control of the state board of higher education in the conduct of or as a result of study or research on an educational, commercial, scientific, artistic, technical, or scholarly issue, regardless of whether the study or research was sponsored by the institution alone, or in conjunction with a governmental or private entity, provided the information has not been publicly released, published, or patented.

Personally identifiable study information is confidential. “Personally identifiable study information” means information about an individual participating in a human research study or project at an institution under the control of the state board of higher education which requires prospective institutional review board review or a determination of exemption, if the information can be used to distinguish or trace the individual’s identity, or is linked or linkable to the individual. Examples of personally identifiable study information include name, maiden name, mother’s maiden name, alias, personal identification number, social security number, passport number, driver’s license number, taxpayer identification number, financial account or credit card number, address, electronic mail address, photographic images, fingerprints, handwriting, and other biometric data. Information about participants in human subjects research which does not constitute personally identifiable study information but is part of a human subjects research study or project at an institution under the control of the state board of higher education requiring prospective institutional review board review or a determination of exemption is a university research record under subsection 8.

Subsections 8 and 9 do not apply to a student record or other information disclosed by an institution under the control of the state board of higher education to the statewide longitudinal data system.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 1; 1993, ch. 441, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 155, § 3; 1997, ch. 381, § 8; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 6; 2007, ch. 385, § 1; 2013, ch. 338, § 1; 2017, ch. 309, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 312, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 239, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 312, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 199, § 54, effective April 29, 2019; 2019, ch. 370, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 374, effective September 1, 2022.

44-04-18.5.
Computer software programs exempt.

Any computer software program or component of a computer software program contracted, developed, or acquired by a public entity or state agency, institution, department, or board and for which the public entity or state agency, institution, department, or board acquires a license, copyright, or patent is exempt from section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota. After receiving written approval from the governor, a state agency, institution, department, or board may enter into agreements for the sale, licensing, and distribution of its contracted, licensed, patented, or copyrighted computer software programs. A state agency, institution, department, or board may take any needed action, including legal action, to protect the state’s interest in the computer software against improper or unlawful use or infringement and may collect and enforce the collection of any sums due for the licensing or sale of the computer software. A public entity may enter into agreements for the sale, licensing, and distribution of its licensed, patented, or copyrighted computer software programs.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 2; 1997, ch. 381, § 9; 1997, ch. 382, § 1.

44-04-18.6.
Access to legislative records and information.

The following records, regardless of form or characteristic, of or relating to the legislative council, the legislative management, the legislative assembly, the house of representatives, the senate, or a member of the legislative assembly are not subject to section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota:

A record of a purely personal or private nature;

A record that is legislative council work product or is legislative council-client communication;

A record that reveals the content of communications between a member of the legislative assembly and any person; and

Except with respect to a governmental entity determining the proper use of telephone service, a record of telephone usage which identifies the parties or lists the telephone numbers of the parties involved.

The exception in subdivision c of subsection 1 applies to records possessed by a member of the legislative assembly or by any other public officer or employee.

This section does not apply to any record distributed at a meeting subject to section 44-04-19 and section 5 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 543, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 31; 2019, ch. 371, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

44-04-18.7.
Criminal intelligence information and criminal investigative information — Nondisclosure — Record of information maintained.

Active criminal intelligence information and active criminal investigative information are not subject to section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota. A criminal justice agency shall maintain a list of all files containing active criminal intelligence and investigative information which have been in existence for more than one year. With respect to each file, the list must contain the file’s number or other identifying characteristic and the date the file was established. The list required under this subsection is subject to section 44-04-18. Personal information of any person contained in an active or nonactive file is an exempt record as defined in subsection 5 of section 44-04-17.1.

“Criminal intelligence and investigative information” does not include:

Arrestee description, including name, date of birth, address, race, sex, physical description, and occupation of arrestee.

Facts concerning the arrest, including the cause of arrest and the name of the arresting officer.

Conviction information, including the name of any person convicted of a criminal offense.

Disposition of all warrants, including orders signed by a judge of any court commanding a law enforcement officer to arrest a particular person.

A chronological list of incidents, including initial offense report information showing the offense, date, time, general location, officer, and a brief summary of what occurred.

A crime summary, including a departmental summary of crimes reported and public calls for service by classification, nature, and number.

Radio log, including a chronological listing of the calls dispatched.

General registers, including jail booking information.

Arrestee photograph, if release will not adversely affect a criminal investigation.

“Criminal intelligence information” means information with respect to an identifiable person or group of persons collected by a criminal justice agency in an effort to anticipate, prevent, or monitor possible criminal activity. Criminal intelligence information must be considered “active” as long as it is related to intelligence gathering conducted with a reasonable good-faith belief it will lead to detection of ongoing or reasonably anticipated criminal activities. Criminal intelligence information also includes training materials and information obtained by a criminal justice agency regarding prospective criminal activities which impact officer safety until the information is publicly disclosed.

“Criminal investigative information” means information with respect to an identifiable person or group of persons compiled by a criminal justice agency in the course of conducting a criminal investigation of a specific act or omission, including information derived from laboratory tests, reports of investigators or informants, or any type of surveillance. Criminal investigative information must be considered “active” as long as it is related to an ongoing investigation that is continuing with a reasonable good-faith anticipation of securing an arrest or prosecution in the foreseeable future.

“Criminal justice agency” means any law enforcement agency or prosecutor. The term also includes any other unit of government charged by law with criminal law enforcement duties or having custody of criminal intelligence or investigative information for the purpose of assisting law enforcement agencies in the conduct of active criminal investigations or prosecutions.

“Personal information” means a person’s medical records or medical information obtained from the medical records; motor vehicle operator’s identification number; social security number; any credit, debit, or electronic fund transfer card number; month and date of birth; height; weight; home street address; home telephone number or personal cell phone number; and any financial account numbers.

A computerized index created by a criminal justice agency of names included in criminal files, whether active or inactive, is an exempt record.

Crime scene images of a victim of a homicide or sex crime or any image of a minor victim of any crime is an exempt record as defined in subsection 5 of section 44-04-17.1.

An image taken by a law enforcement officer or a firefighter with a body camera or similar device and which is taken in a private place is an exempt record.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 544, § 1; 1995, ch. 428, § 2; 1997, ch. 381, § 10; 2001, ch. 393, § 8; 2007, ch. 388, § 7; 2011, ch. 332, §§ 7, 8; 2015, ch. 311, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 308, § 8, effective April 12, 2017.

44-04-18.8.
Examination questions and procedures exemption.

The following records are not subject to section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota: examination or test questions, scoring keys, and other data used to administer any licensing, employment, academic, or certification examination or test, if the examination or test is to be used again in whole or in part; and records establishing examination or test procedures and instructions regarding the administration, grading, or evaluation of any examination or test, if disclosure may affect scoring outcomes.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 442, § 1.

44-04-18.9.
Access to financial account numbers.

Any credit, debit, or electronic fund transfer card or account number and any financial institution account number that a public entity, elected official, or appointed official uses or has available for making electronic or other deposits, transfers, or payments is not an open record.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 383, § 1.

44-04-18.10.
Disclosure of public records.

A public entity may not deny a request for an open record on the ground that the record also contains confidential or closed information.

Subject to subsection 3 of section 44-04-18, if confidential or closed information is contained in an open record, a public entity shall permit inspection and receipt of copies of the information contained in the record that is not confidential or closed, but shall delete, excise, or otherwise withhold the confidential or closed information.

An officer or employee of a public entity may disclose or comment on the substance of an open record. Any agreement prohibiting the disclosure or comment is void and against public policy.

Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, records of a public entity which are otherwise closed or confidential may be disclosed to any public entity or federal agency for the purpose of law enforcement or collection of debts owed to a public entity, provided that the records are not used for other purposes and the closed or confidential nature of the records is otherwise maintained. For the purpose of this subsection, “public entity” is limited to those entities defined in subdivision a or b of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1.

Confidential records that are authorized by law to be disclosed to another entity continue to be confidential in the possession of the receiving entity, except as otherwise provided by law.

Records confidential or exempt under subsection 7 of section 44-04-18.4 and which are required to be disclosed to another entity for emergency or disaster prevention, protection, mitigation, response, and recovery or for cybersecurity planning, mitigation, or threat remain confidential or exempt after the required disclosure.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 4; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 7; 2007, ch. 388, § 8; 2019, ch. 370, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Collateral References.

Construction and Application of Public Interest Fee Waiver Provision of Freedom of Information Act (FOIA), 5 U.S.C.S. § 552(a)(4)(A)(iii). 47 A.L.R. Fed 2d 263.

44-04-18.11.
Disclosure pursuant to subpoena or order.

Unless disclosure under a court order is otherwise prohibited or limited by law, closed records must be disclosed pursuant to a subpoena issued by a court, administrative law judge, or administrative hearing officer, or other court order.

Unless disclosure under a court order is otherwise prohibited or limited by law, confidential records must be disclosed pursuant to a court order. Upon request of the public entity ordered to make the disclosure, the court ordering the disclosure shall issue a protective order to protect the confidential nature of the records.

Any person who discloses confidential records of a public entity under this section is immune from prosecution for violating section 12.1-13-01.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 5.

Collateral References.

Exhaustion of administrative remedies as prerequisite to judicial action to compel disclosure under state freedom of information acts, 114 A.L.R.5th 283.

44-04-18.12.
Cooperative investigations and litigation.

A record acquired by the office of attorney general from a governmental agency or a nonpublic entity is exempt if the attorney general determines:

The record is necessary to monitor or enforce compliance with a law or order or to further a civil investigation or litigation by the state;

The record is treated as confidential or privileged by the provider of the records; and

The provider of the records has not agreed to waive the privilege relating to or confidentiality of the record.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 11; 2003, ch. 437, § 1; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 8.

44-04-18.13.
Lists of minors.

Any record of a public entity that is a compilation of minor’s names, addresses, telephone numbers, or any combination thereof, is exempt.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 12; 2007, ch. 388, § 9.

44-04-18.14.
Information provided to the followup information on North Dakota education and training system. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 127, § 6.

44-04-18.15.
Fundraising and donor records exempt.

Any private donor or prospective donor name, address, telephone number, electronic mail address, estate planning information, tax record or financial information, or other personal information or correspondence received or retained by a board of higher education or university system officer or employee or by an affiliated nonprofit organization that provides support to and is organized and operated for the benefit of an institution under the authority of the board of higher education is exempt.

Any private donor or prospective donor name, address, telephone number, electronic mail address, estate planning information, tax record or financial information, or other personal information or correspondence received or retained by a nonprofit organization that is a public entity is exempt.

For the purposes of this section, “financial information” includes data that provides details regarding a gift, a payment schedule of a gift, the form of a gift, or the specific amount of a gift made by a donor.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 397, § 1; 2007, ch. 387, § 1; 2017, ch. 310, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

44-04-18.16.
Confidentiality of patient records at student health services and university system clinics.

Any patient record of a patient at a state college or university student health service, university of North Dakota medical center or family practice center, or other university system medical center or clinic is confidential.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 398, § 1.

44-04-18.17.
Personal and financial information in a consumer complaint.

Personal and financial information submitted to a state agency as part of a consumer complaint, or gathered pursuant to an investigation of a consumer complaint, is an exempt record as defined in subsection 5 of section 44-04-17.1. For purposes of this section, “personal and financial information” means the home address, home telephone number, social security number, consumer report, and credit, debit, or electronic fund transfer card number of the complainant and any person on whose behalf the complaint is made, and any account number of a business or individual at a bank, brokerage, or other financial institution. “Personal and financial information” does not include the nature of the complaint, name of the complainant or any person on whose behalf the complaint was submitted, or the address or telephone number of the business that is the subject of the complaint.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 399, § 1.

44-04-18.18.
Autopsy images — Confidential — Exceptions.

An autopsy photograph or other visual image or a video or audio recording of an autopsy is confidential. However, a criminal justice agency may use or disclose these materials for purposes of an investigation or prosecution.

After redacting all information identifying the decedent, including name, address, and social security number, and anonymizing facial recognition, a medical examiner, coroner, or physician may use an autopsy photograph, image, or recording for:

Medical or scientific teaching or training purposes;

Teaching or training of law enforcement personnel;

Teaching or training of attorneys or others with a bona fide professional need to use or understand forensic science;

Conferring with medical or scientific experts; or

Publication in a scientific or medical journal or textbook.

A medical examiner, coroner, or physician who has in good faith complied with this subsection is not subject to any penalty or liability for using an autopsy photograph, image, or recording.

The decedent’s spouse, child, parent, or sibling, upon proof of the relationship, may view an autopsy photograph, image, or recording in the business office of a medical examiner, coroner, or physician who has possession of the materials, if there is not an active criminal investigation or prosecution.

Disclosure of an autopsy photograph, image, or recording may be obtained under section 44-04-18.11.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 384, § 1.

Cross-References.

Autopsies, performance of; results, see N.D.C.C. § 11-19.1-11.

Confidentiality of autopsy reports, see N.D.C.C. § 23-01-05.5.

When autopsy permitted, see N.D.C.C. § 23-06-13.

44-04-18.19.
Exemption of records relating to individual recipients of economic assistance or benefits.

Records concerning individual applicants or recipients of economic assistance or support administered under the division of community services or a community action agency, including benefits or services, are exempt from section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota. These exempt records include applications, income or eligibility verification, assessments, or other personal, medical, or financial data.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 378, § 1.

44-04-18.20.
Domestic violence and victim record information exempt.

The address, telephone number, or any identifying information that, if released, could reasonably be used to locate or identify a victim or alleged victim of domestic violence, of a sex offense under chapter 12.1-20, of sexual performances by a child under chapter 12.1-27.2, or of human trafficking under chapter 12.1-41, contained in any record maintained by a criminal justice agency as defined by section 44-04-18.7 or correctional facility as defined by section 12-44.1-01 is exempt.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 388, § 5; 2015, ch. 310, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 308, § 9, effective April 12, 2017.

44-04-18.21.
Electronic mail addresses and telephone numbers exempt.

The electronic mail address or telephone number of an individual which is provided to a public entity for the purpose of or in the course of communicating with that public entity is an exempt record. This section may not be used to shield the identity of the individual communicating with the public entity.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 436, § 1.